District of Columbia statutes.
21-153

Exchanges; appointment of trustees.

In decreeing an exchange of an infant’s estate for other property, pursuant to section 21-151 , the court need not require equality or sameness in the quantity or character of the estate or interest, and the court may appoint trustees to execute the deeds necessary to carry the exchange into effect.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 743, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-153.
1973 Ed., § 21-153.